Hawaii, session 2025, GM1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that establishing a food
and product innovation network is critical to meeting the
State's agricultural and economic diversification goals. The
network will allow businesses in the State to capitalize
globally on the "Hawaii made", "made in Hawaii", "produced in
Hawaii", or "processed in Hawaii" brand; create world-class
products; and scale up production by providing the businesses
with access to a diverse suite of manufacturing•equipment and
industry expertise.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and
appropriate funds for a statewide network of open-access food
and value-added product development facilities to enable
businesses to scale up new products from research and
development to manufacturing and commercialization.
SECTION 2. Chapter 163D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
2025-3372 HB774 CDl HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO.
h"2
C.D. 1
"§163D- Food and product innovation network;
established. (a) There is established within the corporation
the food and product innovation network. The network shall
operate under a centralized coordination structure administered
by the corporation to ensure alignment in standards^
programming, and strategic direction across all facilities
statewide. The purpose of the food and product innovation
network shall be to;
(1) Allow businesses in the State to capitalize globally
on the "Hawaii made", "made in Hawaii", "produced in
Hawaii", or "processed in Hawaii" brand, pursuant to
section 486-119;
(2) Create world-class products; and
(3) Scale up production by providing the businesses with
access to a diverse suite of manufacturing eguipment
and industry expertise.
(b) Partner members of the food and product innovation
network shall include:
(1) Future facilities to be developed on lands set aside
by executive order to the corporation in Kekaha, on
the island of Kauai; a to-be-determined location on
2025-3372 HB774 CDl HMSO 2

Page 3 774
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
the island of Hawaii; and additional facilities on the
islands of Maui, Molokai, and Oahu to expand regional
support and enhance statewide coverage;
(2) The foreign-trade zone facility in Hilo, on the island
of Hawaii;
(3) The university of Hawaii Maui college food innovation
center, on the island of Maui; and
(4) The university of Hawaii Leeward community college
value-added product development center in Wahiawa, on
the island of Oahu.
(c) The food and product innovation network shall:
(1) Offer a range of resources within the wider network to
support innovation and business development, including
courses and events relating to food and value-added
product development, entrepreneurship, marketing,
branding, business management, workforce development,
intellectual property protection, and other topics;
(2) Provide new product development support from
early-stage trials to commercialization by
establishing a network of facilities with equipment of
2025-3372 HB774 CDl HMSO

Page 4 774
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
various scales, providing expert advice, and offering
resources tailored to the regional economies;
(3) Provide low-risk commercial production with
appropriate certifications for exporting products and
selling products locally;
(4) Provide recommendations on process optimization by
offering advice and networking, identifying and
testing equipment, planning trials, and analyzing
results;
(5) Increase exports by securing facilities and developing
compliance programs for off-shore markets; provided
that each county shall have no more than two food and
product innovation network facilities that produce
products labeled "Hawaii made", "made in Hawaii",
"produced in Hawaii", or "processed in Hawaii"
pursuant to section 486-119;
(6) Develop entrepreneurs to grow the State's economy;
(7) Prepare businesses to scale up and achieve autonomous
business success and sustainability;
(8) Establish pathways from early-stage innovation through
commercialization, including pilot testing.
2025-3372 HB774 GDI HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO. K5.2
C.D. 1
certification, and support for accessing capital and
distribution channels;
(9) Facilitate partnerships with research institutions,
educational organizations, and private sector partners
to strengthen innovation pipelines, technology
transfer, and applied research opportunities; and
(10) Engage with national and international partners,
Including foreign innovation networks, to support
shared learning, exchange of best practices, and
cooperative programming that advances innovation,
sustainability, and commercialization outcomes.
(d) No later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, the corporation, on behalf of the food and
product innovation network, shall submit a report to the
legislature that includes:
(1) A description of the food and product innovation
network's activities and progress in the preceding
year, including the activities and progress of primary
members and partner members, in response to the
directives established pursuant to subsection (c);
2025-3372 HB774 CDl HMSO
aaniiaHiiKUH

Page 6 H.B. NO. g?
C.D. 1
An assessment of any progress made in growing the
State's agriculture industry, food industry, and
related industries, and in meeting the State's food
security goals; and
(3) Any proposed legislation."
SECTION 3. Section 163D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Partner member" means an open-access food and value-added
product development facility that is part of the food and
product innovation network but is not managed or operated by the
corporation.
"Primary member" means an open-access food and value-added
product development facility that is part of the food and
product innovation network and is managed and operated by the
corporation."
SECTION 4. Section 163D-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
" (b) The corporation shall [deve-lepT-]_£
(1) Develop, promote, assist, and market agricultural
products for local consumption [7—and-shall promote] j_
2025-3372 HB774 CDl HMSO

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Promote and assist in commercial export of
agricultural products[—]; and
(3) Oversee the food and product innovation network
pursuant to section 163D- ; provided that the
responsibilities and operations of each partner member
shall remain with the partner member."
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $385,289 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 to defray costs associated with the implementation of
the food and product innovation network, including:
(1) $172,884 for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE)
positions; and
(2) $212,405 for other operating expenses.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of health for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3372 HB774 CDl HMSO
inmiiiHiiiiiNMiii

774
H.B. NO
H.D, 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 774, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 774, H.D. 2, S.D. I, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
resident of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
128